test/src/morphology/N-koivu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - koivu: # Noun 'birch / koivu' - full paradigm
     koivu+N+Sg+Nom: koivu
     koivu+N+Sg+Gen: koivun
     koivu+N+Sg+Acc: [koivu, koivun]
     koivu+N+Sg+Par: koivuu
     koivu+N+Sg+Tra: koivukse
     koivu+N+Sg+Abe: [koivutta, koivuta, koivuttah]
     koivu+N+Sg+Com: koivunke
     koivu+N+Sg+Ine: koivus
     koivu+N+Sg+Ela: [koivuspäi, koivus]
     koivu+N+Sg+Ill: koivuh
     koivu+N+Sg+Ade: koivul
     koivu+N+Sg+Abl: [koivulpäi, koivul]
     koivu+N+Sg+All: koivule
     koivu+N+Sg+Ess: koivunnu
     koivu+N+Sg+Ter: koivussah
     koivu+N+Sg+Apr: koivulluo
     koivu+N+Pl+Nom: koivut
     koivu+N+Pl+Gen: koivuloin
     koivu+N+Pl+Acc: koivut
     koivu+N+Pl+Par: koivuloi
     koivu+N+Pl+Tra: koivuloikse
     koivu+N+Pl+Abe: [koivuloitta, koivuloita, koivuloittah]
     koivu+N+Pl+Com: koivuloinke
     koivu+N+Pl+Ine: koivulois
     koivu+N+Pl+Ela: [koivuloispäi, koivulois]
     koivu+N+Pl+Ill: koivuloih
     koivu+N+Pl+Ade: koivuloil
     koivu+N+Pl+Abl: [koivuloilpäi, koivuloil]
     koivu+N+Pl+All: koivuloile
     koivu+N+Pl+Ess: koivuloinnu
     koivu+N+Pl+Ins: koivuloin
     koivu+N+Pl+Apr: koivuloilluo
     koivu+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: koivugi
     koivu+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: koivungi
     koivu+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [koivugi, koivungi]
     koivu+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: koivuugi
     koivu+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: koivuksegi
     koivu+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [koivuttagi, koivutagi, koivuttahgi]
     koivu+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: koivunkegi
     koivu+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: koivusgi
     koivu+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [koivuspäigi, koivusgi]
     koivu+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: koivuhgi
     koivu+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: koivulgi
     koivu+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [koivulpäigi, koivulgi]
     koivu+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: koivulegi
     koivu+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: koivunnugi
     koivu+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: koivussahgi
     koivu+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: koivulluogi
     koivu+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: koivutgi
     koivu+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: koivuloingi
     koivu+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: koivutgi
     koivu+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: koivuloigi
     koivu+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: koivuloiksegi
     koivu+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [koivuloittagi, koivuloitagi, koivuloittahgi]
     koivu+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: koivuloinkegi
     koivu+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: koivuloisgi
     koivu+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [koivuloispäigi, koivuloisgi]
     koivu+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: koivuloihgi
     koivu+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: koivuloilgi
     koivu+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [koivuloilpäigi, koivuloilgi]
     koivu+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: koivuloilegi
     koivu+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: koivuloinnugi
     koivu+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: koivuloingi
     koivu+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: koivuloilluogi
